District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
20 act may be cited as the “Education Code Adjustments Amendment Act of 2025”.
21 Sec. 2. Section 4046 of the Schools Modernization Amendment Act of 2005, effective
22 October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code § 1-325.45), is repealed.
23 Sec. 3. Section 8 of the Youth Bullying Prevention Act of 2012, effective June 12, 2012
24 (D.C. Law 19-167, D. C. Official Code § 2- 1535.07) is repealed.
25 Sec. 4 The Office of Out of School Time Grants and Youth Outcomes Establishment Act
26 of 2016, effective April 7, 2017 (D.C. Law 21-261, D.C. Official Code § 2–1555.01 et seq.), is
27 amended as follows:
28 (a) Subsection 4(a) is amended as follows:
29 (1) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the word “annual” and
1

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
30 inserting the word “biennial”.
31 (2) Paragraph (8) is amended by striking the word “annual” and inserting
32 the word “biennial”.
33 (b) Subsection 5(g) is amended by striking the phrase “November 1” and inserting
34 the phrase “December 15” in its place.
35 (c) Section 8 is amended as follows:
36 (1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
37 (1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the word “annual” and
38 inserting the word “biennial”.
39 (2) Subparagraph (2)(B) is amended by striking the word “annual”
40 And inserting the word “biennial”.
41 Sec. 5. The Public School Enrollment Census Act of 1998, effective March 26, 1999
42 (D.C. Law 12-175, D.C. Official Code § 38-159), is repealed.
43 Sec. 6. Section 2 of An Act To provide for compulsory school attendance, for the taking
44 of a school census in the District of Columbia, and for other purposes, effective February 4, 1925
45 (43 Stat. 806; D.C. Official Code § 38-203), is amended as follows:
46 (a) Subsection (i) is amended as follows:
47 (1) Subparagraph (A-i)is amended as follows:
48 (A) Sub-subparagraph (iii) is amended by striking the word “and”
49 (B) A new sub-subparagraph (vi) is added to read as follows:
2

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
50 “(ii) The number of students whose attendance rate improved after
51 referral to a school-based student support team in the following quarter of that school year.”.
52 (2) Subparagraph (B-i) is amended by striking the phrase “; and”
53 and inserting a semicolon in its place.
54 (3) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
55 phrase “; and” in its place.
56 (4) New subparagraphs (D) and (E) are added to read as follows:
57 “(D) The number of minors, categorized by grade, or equivalent grouping
58 for ungraded schools, who were chronically absent.
59 “(E) The total number of minors, categorized by grade, or equivalent
60 grouping for ungraded schools”.”
61
62 (b) A new subsection (l) is added to read as follows:
63 “(l) Beginning in 2026, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education shall maintain
64 a public dashboard that tracks attendance data for each DC Public and Public Charter School
65 that:
66 “(1) Is updated monthly to reflect the rate of chronically truant and chronically
67 absent students for that school year;
68 “(2) Provides historical data for a comparable reporting period; and
69 “(3) Is filterable by grade level and ward of school.”.
3

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
70 Sec. 7 Section 4072(b) of the Attendance Zone Boundaries Act of 2013, effective
71 December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 38-221(b)), is amended by striking
72 the phrase, “District of Columbia Public Schools ("DCPS")” and inserting the phrase “District of
73 Columbia Public Schools (“DCPS”) and public charter school” in its place.
74 Sec. 8. Title II of the Attendance Accountability Amendment Act of 2013, effective
75 September 19, 2013 (D. C. Law 22-157; D. C. Official Code § 38-236.01 et seq.), is amended as
76 follows:
77 (1) Subsection 206(d) (D.C. Official Code § 38-236.06) is repealed.
78 (2) Subsection 209(d) (D.C. Official Code § 38-236.09) is amended to read as
79 follows: “(d) By December 15 of each year, beginning in 2016, the Office of the State
80 Superintendent of Education shall publicly report on the data provided by local education
81 agencies and community-based organizations in subsection (b) of this section during the
82 preceding school year, including a relevant trend analysis. Beginning in 2026 and every five
83 years thereafter, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education shall submit, as an
84 addendum to its annual public report in subsection (b) , an evaluation drawing on the previous
85 five years of information maintained and reported pursuant to this section to assess the longer-
86 term impact of the disciplinary policies and practices under this title and to provide
87 recommendations for further action by the Council, executive branch, and schools. This report
88 shall include a trend analysis of available data sources, including the Youth Risk Behavior
4

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
89 Survey and any District-wide climate surveys, of outcomes and experiences by race, disability
90 status, sexual orientation, and gender identity.
91 Sec. 9 The Pre-k Enhancement and Expansion Amendment Act of 2008, effective July
92 18, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-202; D.C. Official Code § 38-271.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
93 (a) Section 103 (D.C. Official Code § 38-271.03) is amended as follows:
94 (1) Subsection (e) is amended by striking the phrase " December 30" and
95 inserting the phrase “May 15” in its place.
96 (2) A new subsection (f) is added to read as follows:
97 “(f) The annual reports required by subsection (e) of this section, section 104, and
98 Section 105(a) may be submitted to the Council by May 15 annually as one report.”
99 (b) Section 104 (D.C. Official Code § 38-271.04 is amended as follows:
100 (1) By striking the phrase “December 30” and inserting the phrase “May
101 15” in its place. (c) Section 105(a) (D.C. Official Code § 38-271.05(a)) is amended by
102 striking the phrase “December 30,” and inserting the phrase “May 15” in its place.
103 Sec. 10.Section 4073(d)(2) of The Healthy Tots Act of 2014, effective February 26, 2015
104 (D.C. Law 20-155; D.C. Official Code § 38-282(d)(2)) is repealed.
105 Sec. 11. Section 4074 of The Healthy Tots Act of 2014, effective February 26, 2015
106 (D.C. Law 20-155; D.C. Official Code § 38-283) is amended as follows:
107 (a) Subsection (a) (D.C. Official Code § 38-283) is amended as follows:
108 (1) Paragraph (3) is repealed.
5

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
109 (2) Paragraph (4) is amended to read as follows:
110 “(4) By June 30 of each year, publish the names and locations of
111 licensed child development facilities with 50% or more eligible children enrolled, and whether or
112 not the facility participates in the CACF Program. the number of children who attend those
113 facilities, the number of meals served during each meal service, average daily participation in
114 meal service, and designation of childcare center versus DC
115 (3) Subsection (c) is repealed.
116 Sec. 12. Section 15c of the District of Columbia Nonresident Tuition Act, effective May
117 9, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-126; D.C. Official Code § 38-312.03), is amended by striking the phrase
118 “30 days of July 31, 2012” and inserting the phrase “30 days after September 15, 2027”.
119 Sec. 13. Section 3 of the District of Columbia Board of Education Leasing Authority Act
120 of 1982, effective September 29, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-158; D.C. Official Code § 38-401.01), is
121 repealed.
122 Sec. 14. Section 504 of the Raising the Expectations for Education Outcomes Omnibus
123 Act of 2012, effective June 19, 2012, (D.C. Law 19-142; D.C. Official Code § 38-755.04), is
124 amended as follows:
125 (1) Paragraph (3)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
126 period in its place.
127 (2) Paragraph (4) is repealed.
6

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
128 Sec. 15. Section 103 of the District of Columbia Education Research Practice Partnership
129 Establishment Act of 2018, effective March 28, 2019 (D.C. Law 22-268; D.C. Official Code §
130 38-785.02), is amended by adding a new subsection (e) to read as follows:
131 “(e) Notwithstanding section 1094 of the Grant Administration Act of 2013,
132 effective December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.13), District agencies
133 may enter into a sole-source, non-competitive grant agreements for up to $100,000 with the
134 Partnership for agency research projects focused on education and workforce development that
135 align with the Partnership’s research agenda.”.
136 Sec. 16. Section 502(c)(1) of the Sustainable DC Omnibus Amendment Act of 2014, effective
137 July 27, 2010 (D.C. Law 20-142; D.C. Official Code § 38–825.02(c)(1)), is amended by striking
138 the word “triennially” and inserting the word “biennially” in its place.
139 Sec. 17. Section 405(2) of The Healthy Schools Act of 2010, effective July 27, 2010
140 (D.C Law 18-209; D.C. Official Code § 38-824.05(2)) is repealed.
141 Sec. 18. Section 602(d) of The Healthy Schools Act of 2010, effective July 27, 2010
142 (D.C Law 18-209; D.C. Official Code §38-826.02(d)) is amended by striking the phrase
143 “within 30 days of receipt.” and inserting the phrase “by March 15 of each year.” Sec. 19
144 Section 701(c) of The Healthy Schools Act of 2010, effective July 27, 2010
145 (D.C Law 18-209; D.C. Official Code §38-827.01(c)) is repealed.
146
7

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
147 Sec. 20. Section 404 of the District of Columbia Public Higher Education Reorganization
148 Act, effective October 26, 1974, (88 Stat. 1430; D.C. Official Code § 38-1204.04), is amended
149 by striking the phrase “The Trustees shall make an annual report to the general public, Mayor,
150 Council, and the Congress” and inserting the phrase “The Trustees shall make an annual report
151 available to the general public, Mayor, the Congress, and shall submit an annual report to the
152 Council”.
153 Sec. 21. Section 7(b) of the Education Licensure Commission Act of 1976, effective
154 April 6, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-104; D.C. Official Code § 38-1307(b)), is amended by striking the
155 phrase “File with the Council and the Mayor quarterly reports” and inserting the phrase “Publish
156 information on its website quarterly” in its place.
157 Sec. 22 Section 2402(c) of the District of Columbia School Reform Act of 1995, effective
158 April 26, 1996 (110 Stat. 1321; D.C. Official Code § 38-1804.02(c)), is amended by striking the
159 phrase “December 31” and inserting the phrase “March 15” in its place.
160
161 Sec. 23. Section 3(b) of the State Education Office Establishment Act of 2000, effective
162 October 21, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-176; D.C. Official Code § 38-2602(b)) is amended as follows:
163 (1) Paragraph (28) is repealed.
164 (2) Paragraph (30A) is repealed.
165 (3) Paragraph (33) is amended by striking the period and inserting “; and” in its
166 place.(4) A new paragraph (34) is added to read as follows:
8

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
167 “(34) Have the authority to issue grants, from funds under its
168 administration, to District of Columbia public schools or public charter schools, local education
169 agencies, institutions of higher education, non-profit organizations, community-based
170 organizations, education service providers, or any other entity serving or supporting District
171 learners for the purpose of increasing access to educational opportunities in the District.”.
172 Sec. 24 Section 4025(b)(2) of the Higher Education Financial Aid Assistance Act of
173 2006, effective March 2, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-192; D.C. Official Code § 38-2734(b)(2)), is
174 repealed.
175 Sec. 25. The School-Based Budgeting and Accountability Act of 1998, effective March
176 26, 1999 (D.C. Law 12-175; D.C. Official Code §38-2803) is amended as follows:
177 (a) Paragraph 1102a(d)(1)is amended by striking the word “updated” and
178 inserting the word “included”.
179 (b) Paragraph 1104(b)(2A) is amended by striking the phrase “every year
180 thereafter” and inserting the phrase “every year thereafter, excepting years when the 10-
181 year Master Facilities Plan is published,”.
182 Sec. 26. Section 104(b) of the Uniform Per Student Funding Formula for Public Schools
183 and Public Charter Schools Act of 1998, effective March 26, 1999 (D.C. Law 12-207; D.C.
184 Official Code § 38-2903(b)) is amended by striking the phrase, “The Office of the State
185 Superintendent of Education shall publish the algorithm on its website.”.
9

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
186 Sec. 27. The Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children
187 Establishment Act of 2012, effective May 1, 2013 (D.C Law 19-304; D.C. Official Code § 49-
188 1101.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
189 (a) Section 4(1) (D.C. Official Code § 49-1101.03(1)) is amended by striking the phrase
190 “10 U.S.C. §§1209 and 1211” and inserting the phrase, “10 U.S.C. Chapters 1209 and 1211” in
191 its place.
192 (b) Section 21 (D.C. Official Code § 49-1101.20) is amended as follows:
193 (1) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the word “Five” and inserting the word
194 “Three” in its place.
195 (2) Paragraph (c)(2) is amended by striking the number “3” and inserting the word
196 “one” in its place.
197 Sec. 283. Fiscal impact statement.
198 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
199 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
200 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code§ 1-301.47a).
201 Sec. 29. Effective date.
202 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
203 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
204 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
205 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
10